Wisconsin, session 2025, SB929.
do enact as follows:SB929,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB929,2,7271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, any 3amount of basic pay income received under 37 USC 204 (a) (2) by a member of the 4national guard or a reserve component of the U.S. armed forces and any amount of 5inactive-duty training compensation, as provided pursuant to 37 USC 206 or 206a, 6received by a member of a reserve component of the U.S. armed forces, to the extent 7that such income is not otherwise subtracted under this paragraph.SB929,2,88